California statutes. Water Code
(2) Each member of the expert review panel shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the member attends a meeting of the expert review panel or of the state board plus actual and necessary travel expenses, including expenses for lodging and meals, and for each day the member spends conducting other official business of the expert review panel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 528, Sec. 5.   (AB 574)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13561.5.

The state board shall enter into an agreement with the department to assist in implementing this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13562.

(a) (1) On or before December 31, 2013, the department shall adopt uniform water recycling criteria for indirect potable reuse for groundwater recharge.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), on or before December 31, 2016, the department shall develop and adopt uniform water recycling criteria for surface water augmentation.

(B) Prior to adopting uniform water recycling criteria for surface water augmentation, the department shall submit the proposed criteria to the expert panel convened pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13565. The expert panel shall review the proposed criteria and shall adopt a finding as to whether, in its expert opinion, the proposed criteria would adequately protect public health.

(C) The department shall not adopt uniform water recycling criteria for surface water augmentation pursuant to subparagraph (A), unless and until the expert panel adopts a finding that the proposed criteria would adequately protect public health.

(b) Adoption of uniform water recycling criteria by the department is subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13562.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, no later than June 30, 2014, the department shall adopt, by emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, requirements for groundwater replenishment using recycled water. The adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section shall not be subject to review by the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect
 until revised by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 3, Sec. 15.   (SB 104)   Effective March 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13563.

(a) (1) On or before December 31, 2016, the department, in consultation with the state board, shall investigate and report to the Legislature on the feasibility of developing uniform water recycling criteria for direct potable reuse.

(2) The department shall complete a public review draft of its report by September 1, 2016. The department shall provide the public not less than 45 days to review and comment on the public review draft.

(3) The department shall provide a final report to the Legislature by December 31, 2016. The department shall make the final report available to the public.

(b) In conducting the investigation pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall examine all of the following:

(1) The availability and reliability of recycled water treatment technologies necessary to ensure the protection of public health.

(2) Multiple barriers and sequential treatment processes that may be appropriate at wastewater and water treatment facilities.

(3) Available information on health effects.

(4) Mechanisms that should be employed to protect public health if problems are found in recycled water that is being served to the public as a potable water supply, including, but not limited to, the failure
 of treatment systems at the recycled water treatment facility.

(5) Monitoring needed to ensure protection of public health, including, but not limited to, the identification of appropriate indicator and surrogate constituents.

(6) Any other scientific or technical issues that may be necessary, including, but not limited to, the need for additional research.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) is inoperative on December 31, 2020.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be submitted
 in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 637, Sec. 1.   (SB 322)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13564.

In developing uniform water recycling criteria for surface water augmentation, the department shall consider all of the following:

(a) The final report from the National Water Research Institute Independent Advisory Panel for the City of San Diego Indirect Potable Reuse/Reservoir Augmentation (IPR/RA) Demonstration Project.

(b) Monitoring results of research and studies regarding surface water augmentation.

(c) Results of demonstration studies conducted for purposes of approval of projects using surface water augmentation.

(d) Epidemiological studies and risk assessments associated with projects using surface water augmentation.

(e) Applicability of the advanced treatment technologies required for recycled water projects, including, but not limited to, indirect potable reuse for groundwater recharge projects.

(f) Water quality, limnology, and health risk assessments associated with existing potable water supplies subject to discharges from municipal wastewater, stormwater, and agricultural runoff.

(g) Recommendations of the State of California Constituents of Emerging Concern Recycled Water Policy Science Advisory Panel.

(h) State funded research pursuant to
 Section 79144 and
 subdivision (b) of Section 79145.

(i) Research and recommendations from the United States Environmental Protection Agency Guidelines for Water Reuse.

(j) The National Research Council of the National Academies’ report titled “Water Reuse: Potential for Expanding the Nation’s Water Supply Through Reuse of Municipal Wastewater.”

(k) Other relevant research and studies regarding indirect potable reuse of recycled water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 637, Sec. 2.   (SB 322)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13565.

(a) (1) On or before February 15, 2014, the department shall convene and administer an expert panel for purposes of advising the department on public health issues and scientific and technical matters regarding development of uniform water recycling criteria for indirect potable reuse through surface water augmentation and investigation of the feasibility of developing uniform water recycling criteria for direct potable reuse. The expert panel shall assess what, if any, additional areas of research are needed to be able to establish uniform regulatory criteria for direct potable reuse. The expert panel shall then recommend an approach for accomplishing any additional needed research
 regarding uniform criteria for direct potable reuse in a timely manner.

(2) The expert panel shall be comprised, at a minimum, of a toxicologist, an engineer licensed in the state with at least three years’ experience in wastewater treatment, an engineer licensed in the state with at least three years’ experience in treatment of
 drinking water supplies and knowledge of drinking water standards, an epidemiologist, a limnologist, a microbiologist, and a chemist. The department, in consultation with the advisory group and the state board, shall select the expert panel members.

(3) Members of the expert panel may be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary travel expenses.

(b) (1) On or before January 15, 2014, the department
 shall convene an advisory group, task force, or other group, comprised of no fewer than nine representatives of water and wastewater agencies, local public health officers, environmental organizations, environmental justice organizations, public health nongovernmental organizations, the department, the state board, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, ratepayer or taxpayer advocate organizations, and the business community, to advise the expert panel regarding the development of uniform water recycling criteria for direct potable reuse and the draft report required by Section 13563. The department, in consultation with the state board, shall select the advisory group members.

(2) Environmental, environmental justice, and public health nongovernmental organization representative members of the advisory group,
 task force, or other group may be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary travel expenses.

(3) In order to ensure public transparency, the advisory group established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) On or before June 30, 2016, the department shall prepare a draft report summarizing the recommendations of the expert panel.

(d) The department may contract with a public university or other research institution with experience in convening expert panels on water quality or potable reuse to meet all or part of the requirements of this section should the
 department find that the research institution is better able to fulfill the requirements of this section by the required date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 637, Sec. 3.   (SB 322)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13566.

In performing its investigation of the feasibility of developing the uniform water recycling criteria for direct potable reuse, the department shall consider all of the following:

(a) Recommendations from the expert panel appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13565.

(b) Recommendations from an advisory group, task force, or other group appointed by the department pursuant to subdivision
 (b) of Section 13565.

(c) Regulations and guidelines for these activities from jurisdictions in other states, the federal government, or other countries.

(d) Research by the state board regarding unregulated pollutants, as developed pursuant to Section 10 of the recycled water policy adopted by state board Resolution No. 2009-0011.

(e) Results of investigations pursuant to Section 13563.

(f) Water quality and health risk assessments associated with existing potable water supplies subject to discharges from municipal wastewater, stormwater, and agricultural runoff.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13567.

An action authorized pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent, to the extent applicable, with the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), the federal Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300f et seq.), this division, and the California Safe Drinking Water Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116270) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13569.

The department may accept funds from nonstate sources and may expend these funds, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 637, Sec. 4.   (SB 322)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13570.

(a) As used in this section, “advanced purified demonstration water” means product water from an advanced water purification facility that satisfies both of the following requirements:

(1) The product water is treated by means of all of the following treatment processes:

(A) Microfiltration, ultrafiltration, or other filtration processes to remove particulates before reverse osmosis.

(B) Reverse osmosis.

(C) Advanced oxidation.

(2) The product water
 meets or exceeds all federal and state drinking water standards and is produced in accordance with the advanced treatment criteria for purified water specified in Section 60320.201 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) As used in this section, “advanced water purification facility” means a water recycling treatment plant that produces advanced purified demonstration water in accordance with the advanced treatment criteria specified in Section 60320.201 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) As used in this section, “batch” means an increment of advanced purified treatment water that has completed the treatment process, is separate from incoming water, and is not receiving any additional source water.

(d) Except as expressly set forth in this section, the operator of an advanced water
 purification facility may cause advanced purified demonstration water to be bottled and distributed as samples for educational purposes and to promote water recycling, without complying with the requirements of Article 12 (commencing with Section 111070) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. The volume of advanced purified demonstration water in each bottle shall not exceed eight ounces.

(e) Any operator of an advanced water purification facility seeking to bottle advanced purified demonstration water shall collect water samples from the batch prior to the commencement of the bottling process, and test that batch in accordance with Section 111165 of the Health and Safety Code. Advanced purified demonstration water shall not be distributed unless the following requirements are met:

(1) The water meets or exceeds all federal and state drinking water
 standards, including all maximum contaminant levels applicable to public drinking water systems.

(2) The advanced water purification facility meets or exceeds all purification requirements imposed by regulatory agencies to produce the advanced purified demonstration water, including the removal of constituents of emerging concern where the removal is otherwise required of an advanced water purification facility.

(3) The water is produced using a treatment process that is consistent with the advanced treatment criteria for purified water specified in Section 60320.201 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations and, if established by the state board, in accordance with any uniform statewide water recycling criteria developed for the direct potable reuse of recycled water.

(f) (1) Advanced
 purified demonstration water may be bottled only at a licensed water-bottling plant in compliance with Sections 111070.5, 111080, 111120, 111145, and 111155 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Before bottling advanced purified demonstration water, an advanced water purification facility shall follow all pretreatment and labeling regulations for water bottling, including the requirements described in Section 111070.5 of the Health and Safety Code and the requirements for bottled water and vended water pursuant to Section 111080 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) Advanced purified demonstration water shall be handled from the point of production to the completion of bottling in accordance with all regulations governing the transportation, bottling, labeling, and handling of bottled water, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 111070 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but
 not limited to, subdivisions (a), (b), (f), and (h) of Section 111075 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 111070.5 of the Health and Safety Code. A water-bottling plant that bottles advanced purified demonstration water in accordance with this section may also bottle potable water, subject to compliance with Article 12 (commencing with Section 111070) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) An advanced water purification facility shall not provide bottled advanced purified demonstration water to any person under 18 years of age without the consent of that person’s parent or legal guardian.

(i) An advanced water purification facility shall not provide advanced purified demonstration water for human consumption, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, in bottles, to more than 25 individuals
 per day for 60 or more days in a calendar year.

(j) Advanced purified demonstration water shall be bottled in nonreturnable (one-way) bottles or packages with labels containing the following information in an easily readable format that complies with all of the following:

(1) The label shall state “sample water--not for sale” and “Advanced Purified Water Sourced From Wastewater.”

(2) The label shall set forth the name, address, telephone number, and Internet Web site of the operator of the facility producing the advanced purified demonstration water.

(3) The label shall include a brief description of the advanced purified demonstration water, including its source and the treatment processes to which the water is subjected.

(k) A single advanced water purification facility shall not cause more than 1,000 gallons of advanced purified demonstration water to be bottled in a calendar year.

(l) Advanced purified demonstration water shall not be sold or otherwise distributed in exchange for financial consideration.

(m) Any operator of an advanced water purification facility seeking to bottle advanced purified demonstration water shall establish a collection and recycling program for distributed bottles.

(n) The operator of an advanced water purification facility that is bottling advanced purified demonstration water shall do all of the following:

(1) Maintain a daily record of the number of individuals to whom
 advanced purified demonstration water is distributed, served, made available, or otherwise provided, including, but not limited to, from a bottle.

(2) Compile a report of all daily records described in paragraph (1) for each calendar year.

(3) Certify under penalty of perjury that the report is accurate.

(4) Provide the report within 45 days of the end of the calendar year for which the report was made to the deputy director of the Division of Drinking Water of the State Water Resources Control Board.

(o) This section does not exempt an advanced water purification facility from any standard for bottling water imposed pursuant to federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 408, Sec. 2.   (AB 2022)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Water Recycling Act of 1991 [13575. - 13583.]

13575.

(a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Water Recycling Act of 1991.

(b) As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Customer” means a person or entity that purchases water from a retail water supplier.

(2) “Entity responsible for groundwater replenishment” means any person or entity authorized by statute or court order to manage a groundwater basin and acquire water for groundwater replenishment.

(3) “Recycled water” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 13050.

(4) “Recycled water producer” means any local public entity that produces recycled water.

(5) “Recycled water wholesaler” means any local public entity that distributes recycled water to retail water suppliers and which has constructed, or is constructing, a recycled water distribution system.

(6) “Retail water supplier” means any local entity, including a public agency, city, county, or private water company, that provides retail water service.

(7) “Retailer” means the retail water supplier in whose service area is located the property to which a customer requests the delivery of recycled water service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 753, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13576.

The Legislature hereby makes the following findings and declarations:

(a) The State of California is subject to periodic drought conditions.

(b) The development of traditional water resources in California has not kept pace with the state’s population, which is growing at the rate of over 700,000 per year and which is anticipated to reach 36,000,000 by the year 2010.

(c) There is a need for a reliable source of water for uses not related to the supply of potable water to protect investments in agriculture, greenbelts, and recreation and to replenish groundwater basins, and
 protect and enhance fisheries, wildlife habitat, and riparian areas.

(d) The environmental benefits of recycled water include a reduced demand for water in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta that is otherwise needed to maintain water quality, reduced discharge of waste into the ocean, and the enhancement of groundwater basins, recreation, fisheries, and wetlands.

(e) The use of recycled water has proven to be safe from a public health standpoint, and the State Department of Public Health is updating regulations for the use of recycled water.

(f) The use of recycled water is a cost-effective, reliable method of helping to meet California’s water supply needs.

(g) The development of the infrastructure to distribute recycled water will provide jobs and
 enhance the economy of the state.

(h) Retail water suppliers and recycled water producers and wholesalers should promote the substitution of recycled water for potable water and imported water in order to maximize the appropriate cost-effective use of recycled water in California.

(i) Recycled water producers, retail water suppliers, and entities responsible for groundwater replenishment should cooperate in joint technical, economic, and environmental studies, as appropriate, to determine the feasibility of providing recycled water service.

(j) Retail water suppliers and recycled water producers and wholesalers should be encouraged to enter into contracts to facilitate the service of recycled and potable water by the retail water suppliers in their service areas in the most efficient and cost-effective manner.

(k) Recycled water producers and wholesalers and entities responsible for groundwater replenishment should be encouraged to enter into contracts to facilitate the use of recycled water for groundwater replenishment if recycled water is available and the authorities having jurisdiction approve its use.

(l) Wholesale prices set by recycled water producers and recycled water wholesalers, and rates that retail water suppliers are authorized to charge for recycled water, should reflect an equitable sharing of the costs and benefits associated with the development and use of recycled water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 47.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13577.

This chapter establishes a statewide goal to recycle a total of 700,000 acre-feet of water per year by the year 2000 and 1,000,000 acre-feet of water per year by the year 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 187, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13578.

(a) In order to achieve the statewide goal for recycled water use established in Section 13577 and to implement the Governor’s Advisory Drought Planning Panel Critical Water Shortage Contingency Plan recommendations, Section F2, as submitted December 29, 2000, the department shall identify and report to the Legislature on opportunities for increasing the use of recycled water, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 13575, and identify constraints and impediments, including the level of state financial assistance available for project construction, to increasing the use of recycled water.

(b) The department shall convene a task force, to be known as the 2002
 Recycled Water Task Force, to advise the department in implementation of subdivision (a), including making recommendations to the Legislature regarding the following:

(1) How to further the use of recycled water in industrial and commercial applications, including, but not limited to, those applications set forth in Section 13552.8. The task force shall evaluate the current regulatory framework of state and local rules, regulations, ordinances, and permits to identify the obstacles and disincentives to industrial and commercial reuse. Issues to be investigated include, but are not limited to, applicability of visual inspections instead of pressure tests for cross-connections between potable and nonpotable water systems, dual piping trenching restrictions, fire suppression system design, and backflow protections.

(2) Changes in the Uniform Plumbing Code, published by the
 International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials, that are appropriate to facilitate the use of recycled water in industrial and commercial settings. The department shall make recommendations to the California Building Standards Commission with regard to suggested revisions to the California Plumbing Code necessary to incorporate the changes identified by the task force.

(3) Changes in state statutes or the current regulatory framework of state and local rules, regulations, ordinances, and permits appropriate to increase the use of recycled water for commercial laundries and toilet and urinal flushing in structures including, but not limited to, those defined in subdivision (c) of Section 13553. The department shall identify financial incentives to help offset the cost of retrofitting privately and publicly owned structures.

(4) The need to reconvene the California
 Potable Reuse Committee established by the department in 1993 or convene a successor committee to update the committee’s finding that planned indirect potable reuse of recycled water by augmentation of surface water supplies would not adversely affect drinking water quality if certain conditions were met.

(5) The need to augment state water supplies using water use efficiency strategies identified in the CALFED Bay-Delta Program. In its report pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall identify ways to coordinate with CALFED to assist local communities in educating the public with regard to the statewide water supply benefits of local recycling projects and the level of public health protection ensured by compliance with the uniform statewide water recycling criteria developed by the State Department of Public Health in accordance with Section 13521.

(6) Impediments or
 constraints, other than water rights, related to increasing the use of recycled water in applications for agricultural, environmental, or irrigation uses, as determined by the department.

(c) (1) The task force shall be convened by the department and be comprised of one representative from each of the following state agencies:

(A) The department.

(B) The State Department of Public Health.

(C) The state board.

(D) The California Environmental Protection Agency.

(E) The CALFED Bay-Delta Program.

(F) The Department of Food and Agriculture.

(G) The California Building Standards Commission.

(H) The University of California.

(I) The Natural Resources Agency.

(2) The task force shall also include one representative from a recognized environmental advocacy group and one representative from a consumer advocacy group, as determined by the department, and one representative of local agency health officers, one representative of urban water wholesalers, one representative from a groundwater management entity, one representative of water districts, one representative from a nonprofit association of public and private members created to further the use of recycled water, one representative of commercial real estate, one representative of land development, one representative of industrial interests, and
 at least two representatives from each of the following as defined in Section 13575:

(A) Recycled water producer.

(B) Recycled water wholesaler.

(C) Retail water supplier.

(d) The department and the task force shall report to the Legislature not later than July 1, 2003.

(e) The department shall carry out the duties of this section only to the extent that funds pursuant to Section 79145, enacted as part of the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Act (Division 26 (commencing with Section 79000)), are made available for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 48.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13579.

(a) In order to achieve the goals established in Section 13577, retail water suppliers shall identify potential uses for recycled water within their service areas, potential customers for recycled water service within their service areas, and, within a reasonable time, potential sources of recycled water.

(b) Recycled water producers and recycled water wholesalers may also identify potential uses for recycled water, and may assist retail water suppliers in identifying potential customers for recycled water service within the service areas of those retail water suppliers.

(c) Recycled water producers, retail water suppliers, and entities responsible for groundwater replenishment may cooperate in joint technical, economic, and environmental studies, as appropriate, to determine the feasibility of providing recycled water service and recycled water for groundwater replenishment consistent with the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 13550 and in accordance with Section 60320 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 164, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13580.

(a) A retail water supplier that has identified a potential use or customer pursuant to Section 13579 may apply to a recycled water producer or recycled water wholesaler for a recycled water supply.

(b) A recycled water producer or recycled water wholesaler that has identified a potential use or customer pursuant to Section 13579, that is within the service territory or jurisdiction of a retail water supplier, may, in writing, request a retail water supplier to enter into an agreement to provide recycled water to the potential
 customer.

(c) A customer may request, in writing, a retailer to enter into an agreement to provide recycled water to the customer.

(d) (1) An entity responsible for groundwater replenishment that is a customer of a retail water supplier and that has identified the potential use of recycled water for groundwater replenishment purposes may, in writing, request that retail water supplier to enter into an agreement to provide recycled water for that purpose consistent with Sections 13580.5, 13580.7, and 13580.8, as applicable. That entity may not obtain recycled water for that purpose from a recycled water producer, a recycled water wholesaler, or another retail
 water supplier without the agreement of the entity’s retail water supplier.

(2) An entity responsible for groundwater replenishment that is not a customer of a retail water supplier and that has identified the potential use of recycled water for groundwater replenishment purposes may, in writing, request a retail water supplier, a recycled water producer, or a recycled water wholesaler to enter into an agreement to provide recycled water for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 817, Sec. 2.   (AB 2443)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13580.5.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (e) of Section 13580.7, a retail water supplier that receives a request from a customer pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13580 shall enter into an agreement to provide recycled water, if recycled water is available, or can be made available, to the retail water supplier for sale to the customer.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in accordance with a written agreement between a recycled water producer or a recycled water wholesaler and a retail water supplier, the retail water supplier may delegate to a recycled water producer or a recycled water wholesaler its responsibility under this section to provide recycled water.

(b) A customer may not obtain recycled water from a recycled water producer, a recycled water wholesaler, or a retail water supplier that is not the retailer without the agreement of the retailer.

(c) If either a recycled water producer or a recycled water wholesaler provides a customer of a retail water supplier with a written statement that it can and will provide recycled water to the retailer, the retail water supplier shall, not later than 120 days from the date on which the retail water supplier receives the written statement from the customer, by certified mail, return receipt requested, submit a written offer to the customer that includes the items listed in subdivision (f) of Section 13580.7.
 A determination of availability pursuant to Section 13550 is not required.

(d) If the state board pursuant to Section 13550 makes a determination that there is available recycled water to serve a customer of a retail water supplier, the retail water supplier, not later than 120 days from the date on which the retail water supplier receives a copy of that determination from the customer, by certified mail, return receipt requested, shall submit a written offer to the customer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 817, Sec. 3.   (AB 2443)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13580.7.

(a) This section applies only to a retail water supplier that is either a mutual water company, formed and operating pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 14300) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or a public agency.

(b) A customer may request, in writing, a retail water supplier to enter into an agreement or adopt recycled water rates in order to provide recycled water service to the customer. The retail water supplier, by certified mail return receipt requested, shall submit a written offer to the customer not later than 120 days from the date on which the retail water supplier receives the
 written request from the
 customer that complies with subdivision (f).

(c) If no rate is in effect for recycled water service within the service area of a retail water supplier, the rate and conditions for recycled water service shall be established by contract between the retail water supplier and the customer, not later than 120 days from the date on which the customer requests a contract, or, by resolution or ordinance by the retail water supplier if it is a public agency, or by resolution if the retail water supplier is a mutual water company, not later than 120 days from the date on which the retail water supplier receives the customer’s written request for an ordinance or resolution.

(d) A rate for recycled water service established by contract, ordinance, or resolution, shall reflect a reasonable relationship between the amount of the rate and the retail cost of obtaining or producing the recycled water, the cost of conveying the recycled water, and overhead expenses for providing and administering the use of recycled water service. Capital costs of facilities required to serve the customer shall be amortized over the economic life of the facility, or the length of time the customer agrees to purchase recycled water, whichever is less. The rate shall not exceed the estimated reasonable cost of providing the service, and any additional costs agreed to by the customer for recycled water supplemental treatment.

(e) To
 the extent feasible, the rate for recycled water shall be comparable to, or less than, the retail water supplier’s rate for potable water. If recycled water service cannot be provided at a rate comparable to, or less than, the rate for potable water, the retail water supplier is not required to provide the recycled water service, unless the customer agrees to pay a rate that reimburses the retail water supplier for the costs described in subdivision (c).

(f) The offer required by subdivision (b) and subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 13580.5 shall identify all of the following:

(1) The source for the recycled water.

(2) The method of conveying the recycled water.

(3) A schedule for delivery of the recycled water.

(4) The terms of service.

(5) The rate for the recycled water, including the per-unit cost for that water.

(6) The costs necessary to provide service and the basis for determining those costs.

(g) This section does not apply to recycled water service rates established before January 1, 1999, or any amendments to those rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 817, Sec. 4.   (AB 2443)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13580.8.

(a) This section applies only to a retail water supplier that is regulated by the Public Utilities Commission.

(b) Rates for recycled water that is provided to the customer by a retail water supplier regulated by the Public Utilities Commission shall be established by the commission pursuant to Section 455.1 of the Public Utilities Code. A regulated water utility may request the commission to establish the rate or rates for the delivery of recycled or nonpotable water, with the objective of providing, where practicable, a reasonable economic incentive for the customer to purchase recycled or nonpotable water in place of potable water.

(c) A regulated water utility may propose a rate or rates for recycled or nonpotable water by tariff or by contract between the retail water supplier and the customer. Where the rate or rates are set by contract, the water utility and its customer shall meet, confer, and negotiate in good faith to establish a contract rate.

(d) The commission shall, as appropriate, provide a discount from the general metered rate of the water utility for potable water by either of the following means:

(1) Passing through to the customer the net reduction in cost to the water utility in purchasing and delivering recycled or nonpotable water as compared to the cost of purchasing and delivering potable water.

(2) Granting to the customer a uniform discount from the water utility’s general metered potable water rate when the discount in paragraph (1) is determined to be an insufficient incentive for the customer to convert to the use of recycled or nonpotable water. If the commission provides for a discount pursuant to this paragraph that is greater than the water utility’s reduction in cost, the commission shall authorize the water utility to include the aggregate amount of that discount in its revenue requirements to be applied to, and recovered in, rates that are applicable to all general metered customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 753, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13580.9.
